2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-pi.pat.txt
.n2h2??3
.n2t2
a1
2b3b2
3b2h2
2b3m2
3b2r2
3b2y2
2c3c2
3c2h2
2d3d2
3d2h2
2d3m2
3d2r2
3d2v2
e1
2g3d2h2
2g3g2
3g2h2
2g3r2
2g3y2
2h3m2
2h3v2
2h3y2
i1
3j2h2
2j3j2
3k2h2
2k3k2
2k3l2
3k2r2
3k2v2
3k2y2
2l3l2
2l3y2
2m3b2
2m3h2
2m3m2
2m3p2
2m3y2
2n3d2
2n1h2
2n3n2
2n1t2
2n3v2
o1
3p2h2
2p3l2
2p3p2
2s3m2
3s2n2
2s3s2
2s3t2
3s2v2
3s2y2
3t2h2
2t3n2
2t3r2
2t3t2
3t2v2
3t2y2
u1
2v3h2
3v2y2
2y3h2
3y2v2
2y3y2
2??3c2
2??3h2
2??3j2
2??3??2
??1
??1
??1
2???3???2
3???2h2
2???3
2???3n2h2
2???3
2???3n2h2
2???3g2
2???3k2
2???3h2
2???3y2
2???3???2
2???3???2
2???3???2
3???2h2
2???3???2
